Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB3065.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5403XC (4) 91 nls/ko S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 536.13, subsections 1, 2, and 3, Code 1 2026, are amended by striking the subsections. 2 Sec. 2. Section 536.13, subsections 4 and 5, Code 2026, are 3 amended to read as follows: 4 4. Beginning July 4, 1965, and until such time as a 5 different rate is fixed by the superintendent, the The maximum 6 rate of interest or charges upon the class or classes of 7 regulated loans is as follows: shall be three percent per 8 month. 9 a. Three percent per month on any part of the unpaid 10 principal balance of the loan not exceeding one hundred fifty 11 dollars. 12 b. Two percent per month on any part of the loan in excess 13 of one hundred fifty dollars, but not exceeding three hundred 14 dollars. 15 c. One and one-half percent per month on any part of the 16 unpaid principal balance of the loan in excess of three hundred 17 dollars, but not exceeding seven hundred dollars. 18 d. One percent per month on any part of the unpaid principal 19 balance of the loan in excess of seven hundred dollars. 20 5. A licensee under this chapter may lend any sum of money 21 not exceeding the threshold amount as defined in section 22 537.1301 in amount and may charge, contract for, and receive 23 on the loan interest or charges at a rate not exceeding the 24 maximum rate of interest or charges determined and fixed by 25 the superintendent under authority of this section or pursuant 26 to subsection 7 for those amounts in excess of ten thousand 27 dollars 4 . 28 Sec. 3. Section 536.13, subsection 7, paragraph a, Code 29 2026, is amended by striking the paragraph. 30 Sec. 4. Section 537.2501, subsection 1, paragraph l, Code 31 2026, is amended to read as follows: 32 l. For a consumer credit transaction, a service charge in 33 an amount not to exceed the lesser of either ten percent of the 34 amount financed or thirty one hundred dollars. 35 -1- LSB 5403XC (4) 91 nls/ko 1/ 2 S.F. _____